Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2254.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding the following new subsection: NEW SUBSECTION . 43. a. Develop a policy that prohibits the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics from including a noncompete clause in an employment contract with an advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed practical nurse, a pharmacist, a physician, a physician assistant, or a registered nurse. b. This subsection applies to all employment contracts between an advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed practical nurse, a pharmacist, a physician, a physician assistant, or a registered nurse and the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics entered into, extended, or renewed on or after the effective date of this Act. c. For purposes of this subsection: (1) âAdvanced registered nurse practitionerâ means the same as defined in section 152.1. (2) âLicensed practical nurseâ means an individual licensed under chapter 152. House File 2254, p. 2 (3) âNoncompete clauseâ means any restriction on the right of an advanced registered nurse practitioner, a licensed practical nurse, a pharmacist, a physician, a physician assistant, or a registered nurse to practice in any geographic area or for a defined period of time upon the termination of an employment contract between the advanced registered nurse practitioner, licensed practical nurse, pharmacist, physician, physician assistant, or registered nurse and the university of Iowa hospitals and clinics. (4) âPharmacistâ means the same as defined in section 155A.3. (5) âPhysicianâ means an individual licensed under chapter 148. (6) âPhysician assistantâ means the same as defined in section 148C.1. (7) âRegistered nurseâ means an individual licensed under chapter 152. Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate importance, takes effect upon enactment. ______________________________ PAT GRASSLEY Speaker of the House ______________________________ AMY SINCLAIR President of the Senate I hereby certify that this bill originated in the House and is known as House File 2254, Ninety-first General Assembly. ______________________________ MEGHAN NELSON Chief Clerk of the House Approved _______________, 2026 ______________________________ KIM REYNOLDS Governor